Utah statutes.
67-5-9.   Reassignment of career status employees -- Additional compensation
for managerial assignments -- Employment of special assistant attorneys
general -- Termination of employees -- Salary increases.
This chapter does not affect the authority of the attorney general to:
(1)  assign and reassign employees in a career status to different positions
on his staff.  The salary of an employee reassigned to a different position
shall not be decreased by reason of reassignment; except that if the employee
reassigned occupies the position of chief deputy attorney general, the salary
may be reduced by not more than 15% upon the assignment to a different
position;
(2)  develop a plan for additional compensation for career status employees
who accept managerial assignments within the office.  The provisions of
Subsection (1) notwithstanding, the attorney general may discontinue any
additional compensation if the employee no longer holds a managerial
assignment.  Additional compensation provided under this section shall be
determined by the attorney general pursuant to the plan developed by the
Office of the Attorney General. If the employee no longer holds a managerial
assignment, and the attorney general decides to discontinue any additional
compensation, the reduction may not place the employee at a salary below where
the employee would be through normal salary increases if the employee had not
been in a managerial position;
(3)  employ special assistant attorneys general, who shall not be subject to
this chapter, to represent the state in particular lawsuits or to handle
particular legal matters for the state;
(4)  terminate the employment of any employee of the Office of the Attorney
General who is not in a career service status; or
(5)  establish the salary or determine salary increases of any employee under
this chapter.
